Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIGITAL GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM MAPPING FOR SCHOOL FACILITIES; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,102,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for grants to the regional emergency communications boards, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 403.392, for ongoing maintenance of the statewide digital geographic information system mapping of school facilities project under Laws 2024, chapter 123, article 1, section 18. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until expended. new text end